Delaware, session 153, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter II, Chapter 1, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 136. Prohibition on discrimination. (a) For purposes of this sectio n: (1) âSchoolâ means a public school, including school districts and charter schools. (2) The following terms mean as defined in Chapter 45 of Title 6: a. Disability. b. Gender identity. c. Protective hairstyle. d. Race. e. Religion. f. Sexual orientation. (b) A school may not discriminate against a student based on the studentâs race, ethnicity, creed, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protective hairstyle, body size, pregnancy or childbirth or related conditions, disability, genetic information, socioeconomic status, familial status, immigration status, or housing status. (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a charter school authorized under Â§ 506(a)(3)c. of this title may restrict student admission by gender. Section 2. Amend Â§ 506 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 506. Restrictions [For application of this section, see 83 Del. Laws, c. 316, Â§ 3]. (a) A charter school may not do any of the following: (4) Discriminate Except in regard to gender by a school authorized under paragraph (a)(3)c. of this section, discriminate against any student in the admissions process because of race, creed, color, sex (except in the case of a same-gender school), sex, handicap, or national origin, or any other basis protected under Â§ 136 of this title, or because the studentâs school district of residence has a per student local expenditure lower than another student seeking admission. For the purposes of this subsection: Section 3. Amend Â§ 4161 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4161. Definitions [For applicability of section, see 83 Del. Laws, c. 407, Â§ 2]. For purposes of this subchapter: (2) âBullyingâ means any intentional written, electronic, verbal, or physical act against another student, a school district or charter school volunteer, or a school district or charter school employee that a reasonable person under the circumstances should know will have any of the following effects: b. Create a hostile, threatening, humiliating, or abusive educational environment due to the pervasiveness or persistence of actions or due to actions, a power differential between the bully and the target. target, the target being in any of the classes protected from discrimination under Â§ 136 of this title, or the targetâs age. Section 4. Amend Â§ 4164 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4164. School bullying awareness and prevention; criminal youth gang detection. (b)Â Prohibition of bullying. â (2) Each school district and charter school shall establish a policy which, at a minimum, includes the following components: f. A requirement that each school have a procedure for the administration to promptly investigate in a timely manner and determine whether bullying has occurred, and that such procedure include investigation of such instances, including a determination of whether the target of the bullying was targeted or reports being targeted wholly or in part due to the targetâs race, ethnicity, age, marital status, creed, religion, color, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, identity, or national origin. origin, or any other basis protected under Â§ 136 of this title. This subsection does not preclude schools from identifying other reasons or criteria why a person is a target of bullying. Section 5. The Department of Education shall update all of the Departmentâs regulations related to non-discrimination to reflect the additional protected classes listed in Â§ 136 of Title 14.